Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-569
Class I, II,
III, IV, or VI school district; president; powers and duties.

The president of the school board of a Class I, II, III,
IV, or VI school district shall: (1) Preside at all meetings of the district;
(2) countersign all orders upon the treasury for money to be disbursed by
the district and all warrants of the secretary on the county treasurer for
money raised for district purposes or apportioned to the district by the county
treasurer; (3) administer the oath to the secretary and treasurer of the district
when such an oath is required by law in the transaction of the business of
the district; and (4) perform such other duties as may be required by law
of the president of the board. He or she is entitled to vote on any issue
that may come before any meeting. If the president of the school board of a Class I school district is
absent from any district meeting, the legal voters present may elect a suitable
person to preside at the meeting.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision IV, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1901, c. 63, § 5, p. 439;

Laws 1909, c. 120, § 1, p. 460;

R.S.1913, § 6763;

C.S.1922, § 6304;

C.S.1929, § 79-401;

R.S.1943, § 79-401;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 91, p. 723;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-452;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 322;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 25;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 76;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 21.

For form of oath, see sections 11-101 and 11-101.01.

It is duty of president to countersign all warrants. Fulk v. School District No. 8 of Lancaster County, 155 Neb. 630, 53 N.W.2d 56 (1952).

School district warrant not countersigned by the moderator is not a valid instrument. Pollock v. Consolidated School District No. 65 of Perkins County, 138 Neb. 315, 293 N.W. 108 (1940).